Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
359

STATE
HOUSING PROJECTS

REPEALED. L 1987, c 337, §13; L 1997, c
350, §18; L 1998, c 212, §47.

Note

L 1998, c 2, §93 purports to amend §359-80.

Cross References

For present provisions, see chapter 356D.

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next